Hawaii, session 2026, HB1067.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Act 124, Session Laws of Hawaii 2015, authorized the department of education until June 30, 2020, to award high school diplomas to qualified persons who did not receive a high school diploma as a result of compulsory induction into active service in the armed services. The purpose of this Act is to authorize the department of education to award high school diplomas to qualified persons who did not receive a high school diploma as a result of compulsorily or voluntarily induction into active service in the armed services of the United States or any person whose high school education was interrupted due to wartime practices during World War II, Korean War, or Vietnam War. SECTION 2. Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding to part II a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-     High school diploma for armed services veterans and others.  (a)  The department is authorized to establish a program to award a high school diploma to qualified persons who did not receive a high school diploma as a result of compulsorily or voluntarily induction into active service in the armed services of the United States. (b) For purposes of this section, a "qualified person" is a person who: (1)  Was a resident of the State or the Territory of Hawaii; (2)  Was compulsorily or voluntarily inducted into the armed services of the United States between: (A)  December 1, 1941, and August 30, 1945; (B)  June 1, 1950, and July 31, 1953; or (C)  August 1, 1964, and January 31, 1973, while enrolled in a high school in the State or the Territory of Hawaii; and (3)  Did not complete a high school curriculum and receive a high school diploma. (c) The department shall also award a high school diploma to any person whose high school education was interrupted and did not receive a diploma due to wartime practices during World War II, Korean War, or Vietnam War. (d)  Qualified persons shall submit to the department, on forms that the department shall prescribe, information establishing eligibility for the award of a high school diploma under this section." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST